Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 35
GRAIN INSPECTION

Section

35-35-101. System of grading.

Any person, firm, company, association, or corporation, foreign or domestic, who makes a business of buying grain, wheat, corn, barley, oats, or rye from the producer shall be required to buy the same on the basis of federal grades, and the purchasing agent of each person, firm, company, association, or corporation dealing in grain shall inspect and grade all grain purchased in accordance with the federal grades in effect at the time of said inspection.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 420, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3683.

CSA:

C. 69, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 7-15-1.

L. 62:

p. 129, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-13-1.

35-35-102. Selling grain by sample.

When grain is offered for sale by sample and when it can be agreed between the buyer and seller as to value, it shall be lawful to purchase or sell grain by sample.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 422, § 6.

C.L.

§ 3688.

CSA:

C. 69, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 7-15-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-13-2.

35-35-103. Screenings delivered to seller.

Every corporation, partnership, association, or individual who engages in the business of buying, selling, and milling wheat, oats, rye, barley, or other cereal products and who screens such products, unless otherwise agreed upon between the seller and purchaser, shall deliver all such screenings to the seller of such cereal products free of charge upon request being made therefor by such seller.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 423, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3689.

CSA:

C. 69, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 7-15-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-13-3.

35-35-104. Penalty.

Any corporation, partnership, association, or individual violating any of the provisions of this article 35 commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 423, § 2.

C.L.

§ 3690.

CSA:

C. 69, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 7-15-8.

L. 62:

p. 129, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-13-4.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3279, § 631, effective March 1, 2022.

35-35-105. Right of action for damages.

In addition to the penalties provided for in section 35-35-104, a right of action is hereby given to every such seller of cereal products, as damages from any purchaser of such cereal products, the value of all such screenings so wrongfully detained by any such corporation, partnership, association, or individual.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 424, § 3.

C.L.

§ 3691.

CSA:

C. 69, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 7-15-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-13-5.